Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0571.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5. (1) Except under as otherwise provided by rules promulgated by the department pursuant to this section under subsection (2) or as provided under section 411 of the occupational code, MCL 339.411, a fee collected by the department, when paid pursuant to in accordance with this act, shall must not be refunded. (2) The department shall promulgate rules concerning the refund of fees , pursuant to under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (3) At the beginning of each state fiscal year, the department may promulgate rules under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, to increase the fees collected under this act by a percentage amount equal to not more than the average percentage wage and salary increase granted for that fiscal year to classified civil service employees who are employed by the department. (4) If the department increases fees under subsection (3), the increase is effective for that fiscal year. The department shall use the increased fees as the basis for calculating a fee increase in subsequent fiscal years. (5) By August 1 of each year, the department shall provide the director of the department of technology, management, and budget and the chairpersons of the senate and house of representatives appropriations committees a complete schedule of fees to be collected under this act for the following fiscal year.